Maine, session 132, LD1160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §708, sub-§2, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. The commission may not approve a reorganization pursuant to this section if the
reorganization would result in the ownership of 6% or more or control of a public utility
or the parent company of a public utility by an entity that the commission finds has
provided material aid or comfort to an organization that is designated by the United
States Secretary of State as a foreign terrorist organization in accordance with the
United States Immigration and Nationality Act, Section 219.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §720 is enacted to read:
§720. Public utility ownership of 6% or more or control by entity supporting foreign
terrorist organization prohibited
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an entity that the commission
finds has provided material aid or comfort to an organization that is designated by the
United States Secretary of State as a foreign terrorist organization in accordance with the
United States Immigration and Nationality Act, Section 219 may not own 6% or more and
may not control a public utility or the parent company of a public utility. If the commission
finds, after investigation and an adjudicatory proceeding, that a public utility is in violation
of this section, the commission shall order divestiture of or by the public utility.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.